Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.070

Property, failure of officials or employees to account for—Mutilation by—Penalties.

Any school district official or employee who shall refuse or fail to deliver to his or her qualified successor all books, papers, and records pertaining to his or her position, or who shall willfully mutilate or destroy any such property, or any part thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, the penalty for which shall be a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars: PROVIDED, That for each day there is a refusal or failure to deliver to a successor books, papers and records, a separate offense shall be deemed to have occurred.

[ 1990 c 33 s 538; 1984 c 258 s 317; 1969 ex.s. c 199 s 60; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.130. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 359 s 7, part; RRS s 5049, part; prior: 1907 c 240 s 16, part; 1903 c 156 s 7, part; 1897 c 118 s 165, part. Formerly RCW 28A.87.130, 28.87.130, part.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.